Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:(1) The state building code council shall convene a technical advisory group for the purpose of recommending amendments to the international building code that would allow scissor stairs serving occupancies containing sleeping units of more than two dwelling units in which the occupants are primarily permanent in nature. The recommendations must include considerations for public health, safety, and welfare, as well as construction costs.(2) The advisory group shall provide its recommendations to the council in time for the council to adopt or amend rules and codes as necessary for implementation in the 2027 code update to the state building code.(3) For the purpose of this section, "scissor stairs" means two interlocking stairways with two separate exits, that are separately enclosed and divided by fire-resistance rated assemblies.(4) This section expires January 1, 2031.--- END ---